tr: Tuval gergi çerçevesi köşe birleşim tipi: Düz birleştirme (zımbalı/çivili); Köşe bentleri/donanım dahil; Kırlangıç kuyruğu; Dişli birleştirme; Kamalı köşeler (genişletilebilir); Bindirme ek; Gönyeburun köşe; Zıvana geçme; Diğer
zh-CN: 画布绷框角部连接类型: 对接接头（钉合）; 内含转角支架/五金件; 燕尾榫; 指接榫; 楔形边角（可扩展）; 搭接接头; 斜接边角; 榫卯结构; 其他
fi: Kiilakehyksen kulmaliitoksen tyyppi: Puskuliitos (nidottu/naulattu); Kulmaraudat/kiinnikkeet mukana; Löhenpyrstö; Sormijatkos; Kiilattavat kulmat (laajennettava); Huullosliitos; Jiirikulma; Tappi- ja reikäliitos; Muu
zh-TW: 畫布延展框角落接合類型: 平接 (釘製); 包含角架/五金; 鳩尾榫; 指接榫; 榫接角落 (可擴展); 搭接; 斜角拼接; 榫卯; 其他
sk-SK: Typ naťahovača plátna s upevnením na rohoch: Tupý spoj (zošívaný/pribitý); Vrátane rohových uholníkov/kovania; Rybinový spoj; Zubový spoj; Zabezpečené kľúčmi (rozšíriteľné); Preplátovaný spoj; Zrezaný roh; Spoj na čap a dlab; Iné
it: Tipo di giunzione angolare per telaio di tela: Giunto di testa (spillato/inchiodato); Staffe angolari/ferramenta incluse; A coda di rondine; A dita; Angoli con chiavi (espandibili); A mezzo legno; Angolo smussato; Tenone e mortasa; Altro
cs: Typ rohového spoje napínacího rámu plátna: Tupý spoj (sponkovaný/přibitý); Včetně rohových konzol/kování; Rybinový spoj; Čepový spoj; Rohy s klínky (roztažitelné); Přeplátovaný spoj; Roh na pokos; Čep a dlab; Ostatní
fr: Type d’assemblage des coins du châssis de toile: Assemblage bout à bout (agrafé/cloué); Équerres d’angle/quincaillerie incluses; Queue d’aronde; Enture multiple; Angles à clés (extensibles); Assemblage à mi-bois; Angle en onglet; Tenon et mortaise; Autre
el: Τύπος σύνδεσης γωνίας του σκελετού καμβά: Ενωμένη ένωση (με συνδετήρες/καρφιά); Περιλαμβάνονται γωνιακά στηρίγματα/υλικό; Χελιδονοουρά; Οδοντωτή ένωση; Γωνίες με σφήνες (επεκτάσιμες); Επικαλυπτόμενη ένωση (lap joint); Φαλτσογωνία; Ένωση μόρσου-εγκοπής; Άλλο
pt-BR: Tipo de junta de canto do bastidor de tela: Junta de topo (grampeada/pregada); Suportes de canto/ferragens incluídos; Rabo de andorinha; Junta de dedo; Cantos com chave (expansíveis); Junta de sobreposição; Canto em meia esquadria; Encaixe de respiga; Outro
nb: Hjørnefugetype for lerretsbåre: Støtskjøt (stiftet/spikret); Hjørnebraketter/beslag inkludert; Svalehale; Fingerskarv; Kilte hjørner (utvidbare); Bladskjøt; Gjæret hjørne; Tapp og hull; Annet
de: Eckverbindungsart des Leinwandkeilrahmens: Stoßfuge (geheftet/genagelt); Inklusive Eckwinkel/Eisenwaren; Schwalbenschwanz; Zinkenverbindung; Verkeilte Ecken (erweiterbar); Überblattung; Auf Gehrung; Schlitz & Zapfen; Sonstige
nl: Canvas spieraam hoekverbindingstype: Stuiknaad (geniet/gespijkerd); Inclusief hoekbeugels/ijzerwaren; Zwaluwstaart; Vingerlas; Met spietjes (uitbreidbaar); Halfhoutsverbinding; Verstekhoek; Pen-en-gat; Overig
bg-BG: Тип сглобка на ъглите на подрамката на платното: Челно съединение (заковано); Включени ъглови планки/обков; Лястовича опашка; Зъбно съединение; Ъгли с клинове (разширяеми); Съединение с припокриване; Скосен ъгъл; Чоп и длъб; Други
ro-RO: Tip de îmbinare la colț a dispozitivului pentru întins pânza: Îmbinare cap la cap (capsată/în cuie); Colțare/Feronerie incluse; Coadă de rândunică; Îmbinare în dinți; Colțuri cu pene (extensibile); Îmbinare prin suprapunere; Colț tăiat la unghi; Cep și morteză; Altele
en: Canvas stretcher corner joint type: Butt joint (stapled/nailed); Corner brackets/hardware included; Dovetail; Finger joint; Keyed corners (expandable); Lap joint; Mitered corner; Mortise & tenon; Other
ru: Тип соединения углов подрамника холста: Соединение встык (скобы / гвозди); С угловыми кронштейнами / крепежом; Ласточкин хвост; Шиповое соединение; С клиньями (расширяемое); Внахлест; Ус (под углом 45 градусов); Шип-паз; Другое
sl-SI: Vrsta vogalnega spoja za napenjalcev za platna: Čelni spoj (sponkano/pribito); Vključeni kotni nosilci/okovje; Lastovičji rep; Zobati spoj; Koti s klini (razširljivi); Prekrivni spoj; Zajeralni kot; Čep in utor; Drugo
da: Type af hjørnesamling på lærredets blindramme: Stødkarmsamling (hæftet/sømmet); Hjørnebeslag/hardware medfølger; Svalehalesamling; Fingersamling; Kilehjørner (udvidelige); Bladsamling; Geringshjørne; Tapsamling; Andet
pl: Typ połączenia narożników krosna malarskiego: Połączenie na styk (zszywane/wbijane); Dołączone wsporniki kątowe/okucia; Jaskółczy ogon; Złącze palczaste (mikrowczepy); Klinowane narożniki (rozszerzalne); Złącze zakładkowe; Narożnik uciosowy; Złącze czopowe (gniazdo-czop); Inne
ja: キャンバスストレッチャーコーナージョイントタイプ: バットジョイント (ステープル/釘打ち); コーナーブラケット/金具付属; ダブテール; フィンガージョイント; キードコーナー (拡張可能); ラップジョイント; 留め継ぎ; ほぞ継ぎ; その他
es: Tipo de unión de las esquinas del bastidor del lienzo: Unión a tope (grapada/clavada); Soportes de esquina/tornillería incluida; Cola de milano; Unión dentada; Esquinas con cuñas (expandibles); Unión a media madera; Esquina en inglete; Caja y espiga; Otro
sv: Hörnfogstyp för målarduk: Stumfog (häftad/spikad); Hörnbeslag/monteringsdetaljer ingår; Laxstjärtsfog; Fingerfog; Kilade hörn (expanderbara); Bladfog; Gerat hörn; Tappfog; Övrigt
hu: Vászonfeszítő sarokkötésének típusa: Tompa illesztés (tűzött/szögelt); Sarokelemekkel/szerelvényekkel együtt; Fecskefarkú illesztés; Fogas illesztés / Ékcsapos illesztés; Ékelt sarkok (bővíthető); Átlapolásos illesztés; Gérvágott sarok; Csapozott illesztés (Mortise & tenon); Egyéb
lt-LT: Drobės porėmio kampų sujungimo tipas: Sudurtinė jungtis (susegta / sukalta); Pridedami kampiniai laikikliai / tvirtinimo detalės; Kregždės uodegos formos jungtis; Dantytoji jungtis; Kampai su kaiščiais (išplečiami); Užleistinė jungtis; Įstrižai sujungtas kampas; Įlaidinė jungtis; Kita
th: ประเภทของข้อต่อมุมสำหรับโครงขึงผ้าใบ: ต่อชน (เย็บแม็ก/ตอกตะปู); รวมฉากเข้ามุม/อุปกรณ์; เข้าหางเหยี่ยว; ต่อแบบฟันปลา; เข้ามุมแบบใช้ลิ่ม (ขยายได้); ต่อทาบ; เข้ามุม 45 องศา; เข้าเดือยและรูเดือย; อื่นๆ
ko: 캔버스 틀 모서리 접합 방식: 맞댐 이음(스테이플/못); 코너 브래킷/하드웨어 포함; 도브테일; 핑거 조인트; 키 코너(확장 가능); 겹침 이음(랩 조인트); 연귀 코너; 장부 맞춤(모티스 앤 테논); 기타
hr-HR: Vrsta kutnog spoja nosila platna: Tupi spoj (spojen klamericom / čavlima); Uključeni kutni nosači/okovi; Lastin rep; Zupčasti spoj; Kutovi s klinovima (proširivo); Preklopni spoj; Kosi kut; Utor i čep; Ostalo
vi: Kiểu khớp góc khung căng vải: Ghép đối đầu (ghim/đóng đinh); Bao gồm ke góc/linh kiện; Ghép mộng đuôi én; Ghép mộng răng lược; Góc dùng chốt nêm (có thể mở rộng); Ghép chéo; Góc vát 45 độ; Lỗ mộng & ngàm mộng; Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de junta de canto do esticador de tela: Junta de topo (agrafada/pregada); Suportes de canto/ferragens incluídas; Rabo de andorinha; Junta de malhetes; Cantos com cunha (expansíveis); Junta sobreposta; Canto em meia esquadria; Furo e espiga; Outro